Idaho, session 2025, S1204.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Executive Office of the Governor the
following amounts for the Administration Program to be expended according to
the designated expense classes from the General Fund for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Capital Outlay $45,000
Trustee and Benefit Payments 250,000
TOTAL $295,000
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.